Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 1
DEFINITIONS

Sec.

§ 49-101. Definitions.

Words and phrases used in this title are defined in sections 49-102 through 49-127, Idaho Code. Words used in the masculine gender include the feminine gender, and the singular number includes the plural, as well as the plural the singular.

§ 49-102. Definitions — A.

“Abandon” means to leave a vehicle on private property without the permission of the person having rights to the possession of the property, or on a highway or other property open to the public for the purposes of vehicular traffic or parking, or upon or within the right-of-way of any highway, for twenty-four (24) hours or longer.

“Abandoned vehicle” means any vehicle observed by an authorized officer or reported by a member of the public to have been left within the limits of any highway or upon the property of another without the consent of the property owner for a period of twenty-four (24) hours or longer, except that a vehicle shall not be considered abandoned if its owner-operator is unable to remove it from the place where it is located and has notified a law enforcement agency and requested assistance.

“Accident” means any event that results in an unintended injury or property damage attributable directly or indirectly to the motion of a motor vehicle or its load, a snowmobile or special mobile equipment.

“Actual physical control” means being in the driver’s position of a motor vehicle with the motor running or the vehicle moving.

“Administrator” means the federal highway administrator, the chief executive of the federal highway administration, an agency within the U.S. department of transportation.

“Age of a motor vehicle” means the age determined by subtracting the manufacturer’s year designation of the vehicle from the year in which the designated registration fee is paid. If the vehicle has the same manufacturer’s year designation as the year in which the fee is paid, or if a vehicle has a manufacturer’s year designation later than the year in which the fee is paid, the vehicle shall be deemed to be one (1) year old.

“Agricultural products” means the following unprocessed products:

Agricultural, horticultural, floricultural and viticultural products;

Fruits and vegetable products;

Field grains, seeds, hay, sod and nursery stock, and other plants, plant products, plant byproducts, plant waste and plant compost;

Livestock, dairy animals, swine, furbearing animals, poultry, eggs, fish and other aquatic species;

Other animals, animal products and animal byproducts, animal waste and animal compost; and

Bees, bee products and bee byproducts.

“Air-conditioning equipment” means mechanical vapor compression refrigeration equipment which is used to cool the driver’s or passenger compartment of any motor vehicle.

“Alcohol or alcoholic beverage” means:

Beer as defined in 26 U.S.C. section 5052(a), of the Internal Revenue Code;

Wine of not less than one-half of one percent (.005%) of alcohol by volume; or

Distilled spirits as defined in section 5002(a)(8), of the Internal Revenue Code.

“Alley” means a public way of limited use intended only to provide access to the rear or side of lots or buildings in urban districts.

“All-terrain vehicle” or “ATV” means an all-terrain vehicle or ATV as defined in section 67-7101, Idaho Code.
(12) “Amateur radio operator.” (See “Radio operator, amateur,” section 49-119, Idaho Code)

In the business of testing equipment and systems;

Recognized by the director as being qualified and equipped to do experimental testing; and

Not under the jurisdiction or control of any single manufacturer or supplier for an affected industry.

(13) “Ambulance” means a motor vehicle designed and used primarily for the transportation of injured, sick, or deceased persons, on stretchers, cots, beds, or other devices for carrying persons in a prone position.

(14) “Applicant” means an individual who applies to obtain, transfer, upgrade, or renew a driver’s license.

(15) “Approved driver training course” means a training course from a school licensed under the provisions of chapter 21 of this title [chapter 54, title 54, Idaho Code,] or a driver training course approved by another United States jurisdiction provided the course was taken while an individual was a resident of that United States jurisdiction.

(16) “Approved testing agency” means a person, firm, association, partnership or corporation approved by the director of the Idaho state police which is:

(17) “Armed forces” means the army, navy, marine corps, coast guard and the air force of the United States.

(18) “Authorized emergency vehicle.” (See “Vehicle,” section 49-123, Idaho Code)

(19) “Authorized officer” means any member of the Idaho state police, or any regularly employed and salaried deputy sheriff, or other county employee designated to perform the function of removing abandoned vehicles or junk vehicles by the board of county commissioners of the county in which a vehicle is located, or any regularly employed and salaried city peace officer or other city employee designated to perform the function of removing abandoned vehicles or junk vehicles by the city council, or a qualified person deputized or appointed by the proper authority as reserve deputy sheriff or city policeman, authorized within the jurisdiction in which the abandoned vehicle or junk vehicle is located.

(20) “Authorized transportation department employee” means any employee appointed by the board to perform duties relating to enforcement of vehicle laws as have been specifically defined and approved by order of the board (see section 40-510, Idaho Code).

(21) “Auto transporter” means a vehicle combination constructed for the purpose of transporting vehicles.

(22) “Autocycle” means a motor vehicle designed to travel on not more than three (3) wheels in contact with the ground that has a steering wheel and seating that does not require the operator to straddle or sit astride.

§ 49-103. Definitions — B.

“Bicycle” means every vehicle propelled exclusively by human power upon which any person may ride, having two (2) tandem wheels, and except scooters and similar devices.

“Board” means the Idaho transportation board.

“Boat transporter” means any vehicle combination designed and used specifically to transport assembled boats and boat hulls.

“Boot” means a device used by a towing company or other entity to temporarily immobilize or disable a motor vehicle for purposes of enforcing parking restrictions.

“Broker” means a person who, for a fee, commission, or other valuable consideration, arranges or offers to arrange a transaction involving the sale, but not resale, of a new vehicle, and who is not:

A representative or an agent or employee of a representative;

A distributor, agent or employee of a distributor; or

At any point in the transaction, the owner of the vehicle involved in the transaction.

“Bus” means every motor vehicle designed for carrying more than ten (10) passengers and used for the transportation of persons; and every motor vehicle, other than a taxicab, designed and used for the transportation of persons for compensation. A motor vehicle used in a ridesharing arrangement that has a seating capacity for not more than fifteen (15) persons, including the driver, shall not be a “bus” under the provisions of this title relating to equipment requirements, rules of the road, or registration.

“Business district.” (See “District”, section 49-105, Idaho Code)

“Buy.” (See “Sell”, “sold”, and “purchase”, section 49-120, Idaho Code)

§ 49-104. Definitions — C.

“Cancellation of driver’s license” means the annulment or termination by formal action of the department of a person’s driver’s license because of some error or defect in the driver’s license or because the licensee is no longer entitled to the driver’s license. The cancellation of a driver’s license is without prejudice and after compliance with requirements, the individual may apply for a new driver’s license at any time after cancellation.

“Caravaning” means the transportation of any motor vehicle into, out of, or within the state operating on its own wheels or in tow for the purpose of sale or offer of sale by any agent, dealer, manufacturer’s representative, purchaser, or prospective purchaser, regardless of residence unless the motor vehicle is licensed by the state of Idaho, or is owned by an automobile dealer, duly licensed as a dealer by this state. It shall also be considered as the transportation of property for hire by a motor vehicle upon the highways of this state.

“Certificate of liability insurance” means a certificate of liability insurance issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in this state or a certificate of liability insurance issued by the department of insurance which demonstrates current insurance against loss resulting from liability imposed by law for bodily injury or death or damage to property suffered by any person caused by accident and arising out of the operation, maintenance or use of a motor vehicle described in the certificate in an amount not less than that required by section 49-117(20), Idaho Code, and also demonstrates the current existence of any other coverage required by title 41, Idaho Code, or a certificate of self-insurance issued pursuant to law for each motor vehicle to be registered. A certificate of liability insurance shall contain the information required by the department of insurance, including the name and address of the owner of the motor vehicle and a description of the motor vehicle including identification number if there is one, or a statement that all vehicles owned by a person or entity are covered by insurance, the inception date of coverage, and the name of the insurer. “Certificate of liability insurance” may also include the original contract of liability insurance or a true copy, demonstrating the current existence of the liability insurance described in this subsection.

“Certification of safety compliance” means that a motor carrier certifies as part of its registration process that it has knowledge of the federal regulations and rules promulgated by the Idaho transportation department and the Idaho state police applicable to motor carriers.

“Chains” means metal traction devices required pursuant to section 49-948, Idaho Code, which consist of two (2) circular metal loops, one (1) on each side of the tire, connected by not less than nine (9) evenly spaced chains across the tire tread.

“Coerce” means to compel or attempt to compel by threat or use of force.

“Commercial coach.” (See section 39-4301, Idaho Code)

“Commercial driver’s license” means any class A, class B or class C driver’s license as defined in section 49-105, Idaho Code.

“Commercial driver license information system (CDLIS)” is the information system established to serve as a clearinghouse for locating information related to the licensing and identification of motor vehicle drivers.

“Commercial driver training school” means a business enterprise conducted by an individual, association, partnership, or corporation, for the education and training of persons, either practically or theoretically, or both, to operate or drive motor vehicles, and charging a consideration or tuition for such services.
(11) “Commercial learner’s permit” means a permit issued to an individual by a state or other jurisdiction of domicile, in accordance with the standards contained in 49 CFR 383.5, that when carried with a valid driver’s license issued by the same state or jurisdiction, authorizes the individual to operate a commercial vehicle when accompanied by a holder of a valid commercial driver’s license (CDL) for purposes of behind-the-wheel training.

The person has pled guilty or has been found guilty, notwithstanding the form of the judgment or withheld judgment. A conviction for purposes of this title shall also include an infraction judgment.

For purposes of disqualification or withdrawal of commercial vehicle driving privileges only, “conviction” means an unvacated adjudication of guilt, or determination that a person has violated or failed to comply with the law in a court of original jurisdiction or by an authorized administrative tribunal, an unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to secure the person’s appearance in court, a plea of guilty or nolo contendere accepted by the court, the payment of a fine or court cost, or violation of a condition of release without bail, regardless of whether or not the penalty is rebated, suspended or probated.

(12) “Commercial vehicle” or “commercial motor vehicle.” (See “Vehicle,” section 49-123, Idaho Code)

(13) “Compliance review” means an on-site examination of motor carrier operations, which may be at the carrier’s place of business, including driver’s hours of service, vehicle maintenance and inspection, driver qualifications, commercial driver’s license requirements, financial responsibility, accidents, hazardous materials, and such other related safety and transportation records to determine safety fitness.

(14) “Controlled substance” means any substance so classified under section 102(6) of the controlled substances act, 21 U.S.C. 802(6), and includes all substances listed on schedules I through V, of 21, CFR part 1308, as they may be revised from time to time.

(15) “Conviction” means:

(16) “Crosswalk” means:

(a) That part of a highway at an intersection included within the connections of the lateral lines of the sidewalks on opposite sides of the highway measured from the curbs or in the absence of curbs, from the edges of the traversable highway; and in the absence of a sidewalk on one side of the highway, that part of a highway included within the extension of the lateral lines of the existing sidewalk at right angles to the centerline.

(b) Any portion of a highway at an intersection or elsewhere distinctly indicated for pedestrian crossing by lines or other markings on the surface.

§ 49-105. Definitions — D.

“Dealer” means every person in the business of buying, selling or exchanging five (5) or more new or used vehicles, new or used neighborhood electric vehicles, new or used motorcycles, motor-driven cycles, snow machines or motorbikes, travel trailers, truck campers, all-terrain vehicles, utility type vehicles or motor homes in any calendar year, either outright or on conditional sale, bailment, lease, chattel mortgage, or otherwise, or who has an established place of business for the sale, lease, trade, or display of these vehicles. No insurance company, bank, finance company, public utilities company, or other person coming into possession of any vehicle, as an incident to its regular business, who shall sell that vehicle under any contractual rights it may have, shall be considered a dealer. See also “salvage pool,” section 49-120, Idaho Code.

“Dealer’s selling agreement.” (See “Franchise,” section 49-107, Idaho Code)

“Department” means the Idaho transportation department acting directly or through its duly authorized officers and agents, except in chapters 6 and 9, title 49, Idaho Code, where the term means the Idaho state police, except as otherwise specifically provided.

“Designated family member” means the spouse, child, grandchild, parent, brother or sister of the owner of a vehicle dealership who, in the event of the owner’s death, is entitled to inherit the ownership interest in the dealership under the same terms of the owner’s will, or who has been nominated in any other written instrument, or who, in the case of an incapacitated owner of a dealership, has been appointed by a court as the legal representative of the dealer’s property.

“Director” means the director of the Idaho transportation department, except in chapters 6, 9 and 22, title 49, Idaho Code, where the term means the director of the Idaho state police.

“Disclose” means to engage in any practice or conduct to make available and make known personal information contained in records of the department about a person to any other person, organization or entity, by any means of communication.

“Disqualification” as defined in 49 CFR part 383, means withdrawal by the department of commercial vehicle driving privileges.

“Distributor” means any person, firm, association, corporation or trust, resident or nonresident, who has a franchise from a manufacturer of vehicles to distribute vehicles in this state, and who in whole or in part sells or distributes new vehicles to dealers or who maintains distributor representatives.

“Distributor branch” means a branch office similarly maintained by a distributor for the same purposes a factory branch is maintained.

“Distributor representative” means any person, firm, association, corporation or trust, and each officer and employee thereof engaged as a representative of a distributor or distributor branch of vehicles for the purpose of making or promoting the sale of vehicles, or for supervising or contacting dealers or prospective dealers.

“District” means:
(a) Business district. The territory contiguous to and including a highway when within any six hundred (600) feet along the highway there are buildings in use for business or industrial purposes, including hotels, banks or office buildings, railroad stations and public buildings which occupy at least three hundred (300) feet of frontage on one side or three hundred (300) feet collectively on both sides of the highway.

“Documented vessel” means a vessel having a valid marine document as a vessel of the United States.

“Downgrade” as it pertains to commercial drivers licensing shall mean either:

The driver has changed his or her medical requirement self-certification to interstate but operates exclusively in transportation or operations excepted from part 391 of the federal motor carrier safety regulations; or

The driver has changed his or her medical requirement self-certification to intrastate and operates exclusively in transportation or operations as listed in section 67-2901B(2), Idaho Code; or

The driver no longer has commercial motor vehicle driving privileges, but has retained privileges to drive noncommercial motor vehicles.

“Drag race” means the operation of two (2) or more vehicles from a point side by side at accelerating speeds in a competitive attempt to outdistance each other, or the operation of one (1) or more vehicles over a common selected course, from the same point to the same point, for the purpose of comparing the relative speeds or power of acceleration of the vehicles within a certain distance or time limit.

“Driver” means every person who drives or is in actual physical control of a vehicle.

“Driver’s license” means a license or permit issued by the department or by any other jurisdiction to an individual which authorizes the individual to operate a motor vehicle or commercial motor vehicle on the highways in accordance with the requirements of title 49, Idaho Code.

“Driver’s license — Classes of” are issued for the operation of a vehicle based on the size of the vehicle or the type of load and mean:

Class A. This license shall be issued and valid for the operation of any combination of motor vehicles with a manufacturer’s gross combination weight rating (GCWR) in excess of twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds, provided the manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR) of the vehicle(s) being towed is in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds. Persons holding a valid class A license may also operate vehicles requiring a class B, C or D license.

Class B. This license shall be issued and valid for the operation of any single vehicle with a manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR) in excess of twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds, or any such vehicle towing a vehicle not in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR). Persons holding a valid class B license may also operate vehicles requiring a class C license or a class D license.

Class C. This license shall be issued and valid for the operation of any single vehicle or combination of vehicles that does not meet the definition of class A or class B, as defined in this section, but that either is designed to transport sixteen (16) or more people including the driver, or is of any size which does not meet the definition of class A or class B and is used in the transportation of materials found to be hazardous according to the hazardous material transportation act and which requires the motor vehicle to be placarded under the federal hazardous materials regulations 49 CFR part 172, subpart F. Persons holding a valid class C license may also operate vehicles requiring a class D license.

Class D. This license shall be issued and valid for the operation of a motor vehicle that is not a commercial vehicle as defined in section 49-123, Idaho Code.

“Seasonal driver’s license” means a special restricted class B or C driver’s license to operate certain commercial vehicles in farm-related industries under restrictions imposed by the department. As used in this definition, “farm-related industry” shall mean custom harvesters, farm retail outlets and suppliers, agri-chemical businesses and livestock feeders. Seasonal driver’s licenses are not valid for driving vehicles carrying any quantities of hazardous material requiring placarding, except for diesel fuel in quantities of one thousand (1,000) gallons or less, liquid fertilizers, i.e., plant nutrients, in vehicles or implements of husbandry with total capacities of three thousand (3,000) gallons or less, and solid fertilizers, i.e., solid plant nutrients, that are not mixed with any organic substance.

“Driver record” means any record that pertains to an individual’s driver’s license, driving permit, driving privileges, driving history, identification documents or other similar credentials issued by the department.

“Driver’s license endorsements” means special authorizations that are required to be displayed on a driver’s license which permit the driver to operate certain types of commercial vehicles or commercial vehicles hauling certain types of cargo, or to operate a motorcycle or a school bus.

“Endorsement T — Double/Triple trailer” means this endorsement is required on a class A, B or C license to permit the licensee to operate a vehicle authorized to tow more than one (1) trailer.

“Endorsement H — Hazardous material” means this endorsement is required on a class A, B or C license if the driver is operating a vehicle used in the transportation of materials found to be hazardous according to the hazardous material transportation act and which requires the motor vehicle to be placarded under the federal hazardous materials regulations 49 CFR part 172, subpart F.

“Endorsement P — Passenger” means this endorsement is required on a class A, B or C license to permit the licensee to operate a vehicle designed to transport sixteen (16) or more people including the driver.

“Endorsement N — Tank vehicle” means this endorsement is required on a class A, B or C license to permit the licensee to operate a tank vehicle as defined in section 49-123, Idaho Code.

“Endorsement M — Motorcycle” means this endorsement is required on a driver’s license to permit the driver to operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle.

“Endorsement S — School bus” means this endorsement is required on a class A, B or C license to permit the licensee to operate a school bus in accordance with 49 CFR part 383, to transport preprimary, primary or secondary school students from home to school, from school to home, or to and from school-sponsored events. School bus does not include a bus used as a common carrier.
(20) “Driveway” means a private road giving access from a public way to a building on abutting grounds.

(b) Residential district. The territory contiguous to and including a highway not comprising a business district when the property on the highway for a distance of three hundred (300) feet or more is in the main improved with residences, or residences and buildings in use for business.

(c) Urban district. The territory contiguous to and including any highway which is built up with structures devoted to business, industry or dwelling houses. For purposes of establishing speed limits in accordance with the provisions of section 49-654, Idaho Code, no state highway or any portion thereof lying within the boundaries of an urban district is subject to the limitations which otherwise apply to nonstate highways within an urban district.

(21) “Dromedary tractor” means every motor vehicle designed and used primarily for drawing a semitrailer and so constructed as to carry manifested cargo in addition to a part of the weight of the semitrailer.

§ 49-106. Definitions — E.

“Electric-assisted bicycle” means a bicycle equipped with fully operable pedals and an electric motor of less than seven hundred fifty (750) watts and that meets one (1) of the following requirements:

“Class 1 electric-assisted bicycle” means an electric-assisted bicycle equipped with a motor that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and ceases when the rider stops pedaling or when the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty (20) miles per hour.

“Class 2 electric-assisted bicycle” means an electric-assisted bicycle equipped with a motor that may be used exclusively to propel the bicycle and that is not capable of providing assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty (20) miles per hour.

“Class 3 electric-assisted bicycle” means an electric-assisted bicycle equipped with a motor that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and ceases when the rider stops pedaling or when the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty-eight (28) miles per hour.

“Electric personal assistive mobility device” means a self-balancing two (2) nontandem wheeled device designed to transport only one (1) person, with an electric propulsion system that limits the maximum speed of the device to fifteen (15) miles per hour or less.

“Emergency vehicle.” (See “Vehicle,” section 49-123, Idaho Code)

“Encumbrance.” (See “Lien,” section 49-113, Idaho Code)

“EPA” means the environmental protection agency of the United States.

“Essential parts” means all integral and body parts of a vehicle of a type required to be registered, the removal, alteration or substitution of which would tend to conceal the identity of the vehicle or substantially alter its appearance, model, type or mode of operation.

“Established place of business” means a place occupied either continuously or at regular periods by a dealer or manufacturer where his books and records are kept and a large share of his business is transacted.

“Excessive” or “unusual noise” means any sound made by a passenger motor vehicle or a motorcycle at any time under any condition of grade, speed, acceleration or deceleration, which exceeds ninety-two (92) decibels, or any lower decibel level that is fixed by law or rules adopted by the board of health and welfare, on the “A” scale of a general radio company no. 1551-B sound level meter, or equivalent, stationed at a distance of not less than twenty (20) feet to the side of a vehicle or motorcycle as the vehicle or motorcycle passes the soundmeter or is stationed not less than twenty (20) feet from a stationary motor or engine.

“Excessive speed” means any speed of fifteen (15) miles per hour or more above the posted speed limit, and is only for purposes of determining disqualification of commercial driving privileges.

“Executive head,” as used in chapter 20, title 49, Idaho Code, means the governor of the state of Idaho.

“Explosives” means any chemical compound or mechanical mixture that is commonly used or intended for the purpose of producing an explosion and which contains any oxidizing and combustive units or other ingredients in proportions, quantities or packing that an ignition by fire, by friction, by concussion, by percussion or by detonator of any part of the compound or mixture may cause a sudden generation of highly heated gases with which the resultant gaseous pressures are capable of producing destructive effects on contiguous objects or of destroying life or limb.
(12) “Extraordinary circumstances” means any situation where an emergency exists or public safety is endangered, or any situation in which a vehicle:

Is blocking or impeding traffic; or

Is causing a hazard; or

Has the potential of impeding any emergency vehicle; or

Is impeding any snow removal or other road maintenance operation; or

Has been stolen but not yet reported as recovered; or

Is not registered, or displays a license plate registration tag which has been expired; or

Has been involved in an accident and remains on the highway; or

The driver of which has been arrested.

§ 49-106A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-107. Definitions — F.

“Factory branch” means a branch office maintained by a person who manufactures or assembles vehicles for sale to distributors or to dealers, or for directing or supervising, in whole or in part, its representatives.

“Factory representative” means any person and each officer and employee engaged as a representative of a manufacturer of vehicles or by a factory branch for the purpose of making or promoting a sale of their vehicles, or for supervising or contacting their dealers or prospective dealers.

“Farm tractor” means every motor vehicle designed or adapted and used primarily as a farm implement power unit operated with or without other farm implements attached in any manner consistent with the structural design of that power unit.

“Farm vehicle.” (See “Vehicle,” section 49-123, Idaho Code)

“Federal motor vehicle safety standards (FMVSS)” means those safety standards established by the national highway traffic safety administration, under title 49 CFR part 500-599, for the safe construction and manufacturing of self-propelled motorized vehicles for operation on public highways. Such vehicles as originally designed and manufactured shall be so certified by the manufacturer to meet the federal motor vehicle safety standards or the standards in force for a given model year or as certified by the national highway traffic safety administration.

“Felony” means any offense under state or federal law that is punishable by death or imprisonment for a term exceeding one (1) year.

“Fifth wheel trailer.” (See “Trailer,” section 49-121, Idaho Code)

“Financial institution” means any bank that is authorized to do business in the state of Idaho and any other financial institution that is registered with the department of finance.

“Flammable liquid” means any liquid which has a flash point of 70 degrees Fahrenheit, or less, as determined by a tagliabue or equivalent closed-cup test device.

“Fleet” means one (1) or more apportionable vehicles.

“Fleet registration” means an optional form of registration through the department rather than a county assessor for registration of twenty-five (25) or more commercial or farm vehicles or any combination thereof. This registration is not an option for fleets of rental vehicles. Terms and conditions are further specified in section 49-434(5), Idaho Code.

“Fold down camping trailer.” (See “Trailer,” section 49-121, Idaho Code)

“Foreign vehicle.” (See “Vehicle,” section 49-123, Idaho Code)

“Forest products” means all products derived from trees including, but not limited to, saw logs, veneer logs, poles, cedar products, pulp logs, fence posts, wood chips and every form into which a fallen tree may be cut before it is manufactured into lumber or run through a processing mill or cut into cordwood, stove wood or hewn ties.

“Franchise” means a sales, service and parts agreement or any other contract or agreement between a dealer and a manufacturer of new vehicles or its distributor or factory branch by which the dealer is authorized to engage in the business of selling any specified make or makes of new vehicles.

§ 49-108. Definitions — G.

“Good cause” means the failure of a dealer to comply with reasonable performance criteria established by a manufacturer, if the dealer was apprised by the manufacturer, in writing, of that failure; and

The notification stated that notice was provided of failure of performance;

The dealer was afforded a reasonable opportunity, for a period of not less than six (6) months, to comply with the criteria; and

The dealer did not demonstrate substantial progress toward compliance with the performance criteria of the manufacturer during the period.

“Gross combination weight rating (GCWR)” for the purposes of chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, means the value specified by the manufacturer as the maximum loaded weight of a combination (articulated) vehicle. In the absence of a value specified by the manufacturer, GCWR will be determined by adding the GVWR of the power unit and the total weight of the towed unit and any load thereon or registered weight rating whichever is greater. Towed units shall not include implements of husbandry. For the purposes of chapter 3, title 49, Idaho Code, “gross combined weight rating (GCWR) is as defined in 49 CFR part 383.

“Gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR)” for the purposes of chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, means the value specified by the manufacturer as the maximum loaded weight of a single vehicle or registered weight rating, whichever is greater. For the purposes of chapter 3, title 49, Idaho Code, “gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR) is as defined in 49 CFR part 383.

“Gross weight” means the weight of a vehicle without load plus the weight of any load on that vehicle.

“Group of vehicles” is one motor vehicle operated under its own motive power with one (1) motor vehicle in tow, or one or more motor vehicles in tow in saddlemount fashion, providing that saddlemounting meets the requirements prescribed by the United States department of transportation.

§ 49-109. Definitions — H.

“Habitual violator” means any person who has a driving record that shows a violation point count of eighteen (18) or more points in any consecutive twenty-four (24) month period; or twenty-four (24) or more points in any consecutive thirty-six (36) month period.

“Hazardous material” means any material that has been designated as hazardous under 49 U.S.C. 5103 and is required to be placarded under subpart F of 49 CFR part 172 or any quantity of material listed as a select agent or toxin under 42 CFR part 73.

“Hazardous waste” means a material that is subject to the hazardous waste manifest requirements of the EPA due to the type and quantity of the material or that would be subject to these requirements absent an interim authorization to the state under title 40, code of federal regulations or that includes in whole or in part polychlorinated biphenyls regulated by title 40, code of federal regulations, part 761.

“Highway” means the entire width between the boundary lines of every way publicly maintained when any part is open to the use of the public for vehicular travel, with jurisdiction extending to the adjacent property line, including sidewalks, shoulders, berms and rights-of-way not intended for motorized traffic. The term “street” is interchangeable with highway.

Arterial. Any highway designated by the local authority as part of a major arterial system of highways within its jurisdiction.

Controlled-access. Any highway or roadway in respect to which owners or occupants of abutting lands and other persons have no legal right of access to or from the highway except at such points only or in such manner as may be determined by the public authority having jurisdiction over the highway.

Through. Any highway or portion of it on which vehicular traffic is given preferential right-of-way and at the entrances to which vehicular traffic from intersecting highways is required by law to yield the right-of-way to vehicles on the through highway in obedience to a stop sign, yield sign, or other traffic-control device.